New Jersey, session 222, S4472.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Each member of the Senate and General Assembly shall hold at least two town hall meetings annually, with at least one of the two town hall meetings each year to be held in the members legislative district.  The purpose of the town hall meetings required by this section shall be for members of the Legislature to receive comments, and to receive and answer questions, directly from their constituents and other members of the public on any issue or policy matter.  Members of the Legislature may hold a joint town hall meeting with other legislators or other elected officials. b.  Each town hall meeting required to be held pursuant to this section shall be open to the public and shall be held in a location that is convenient for members of the public and accessible to individuals with disabilities.  Each town hall meeting shall provide at least one hour for a legislator to receive comments and answer questions from members of the public, except that a town hall meeting with four or more legislators shall provide at least two hours. c. At least seven calendar days prior to a town hall meeting to be held as required by this section, the member or members of the Legislature holding the town hall meeting shall publish an official public notice of the date, time, and location of the town hall meeting. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.